Massachusetts, session 194th, H3044.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Paragraph (1) of subsection (d) of section 2 of chapter 62 of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out subparagraph (D).
of 1